Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1901.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2200.28A of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Hospital staff, representatives of procurement


organizations, or any other party involved with the procurement of


anatomical gifts or the determination of death of a prospective


donor or decedent shall not make inquiries relating to, or otherwise


discuss, potential anatomical gifts with the immediate family of a


decedent within twenty-four (24) hours of the official determination

Req. No. 3116 Page 1


of death of such decedent pursuant to Section 3122 of Title 63 of


the Oklahoma Statutes.


B. Hospital staff, representatives of procurement


organizations, or any other party involved with the procurement of


anatomical gifts or the determination of death of a prospective


donor or decedent, in the course of discussing the collection of


potential anatomical gifts with the immediate family of a decedent,


shall not:


1. Misrepresent the status of the LifeShare Donor Registry;


2. Imply that the donation of an anatomical gift will hasten


end-of-life care; or


3. Suggest financial compensation for an anatomical gift.


C. A procurement organization or its representatives shall


provide families of prospective donors or decedents:


1. Full disclosure of potential conflicts of interest;


2. A written summary of the donation process; and


3. Contact information for an independent state ombudsperson


for complaints.


All discussions of potential anatomical gifts between an organ


processing organization and the family of a potential donor or


decedent shall, with the written consent of the family of a


potential donor or decedent, be electronically recorded.


D. Any person may report to the State Department of Health any


violation of the provisions of this section. If a person who

Req. No. 3116 Page 2


reports such violations to the Department is an employee of the


entity that is the subject of the violation, that person shall be


granted anonymity, and such entity shall not take disciplinary


action against such person.


E. The Department shall investigate all reports of violations


of this section. The State Commissioner of Health may promulgate


rules to enforce the provisions of this section.


F. Hospital staff, representatives of procurement


organizations, or any other party involved with the procurement of


anatomical gifts or the determination of death of a decedent who


violates the provisions of this section shall be subject to a civil


penalty not to exceed Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) for each


violation. Each individual violation shall be considered a separate


violation


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 3122, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 3122. A. An individual who has sustained either:


1. irreversible Irreversible cessation of circulatory and


respiratory functions,; or


2. irreversible Irreversible cessation of all functions of the


entire brain, including the brain stem,


is dead. A determination of death must be made in accordance with


accepted medical standards; provided, however, all reasonable



Req. No. 3116 Page 3


attempts to restore spontaneous circulatory or respiratory functions


shall first be made, prior to such declaration.


B. For the purpose of anatomical gifts, any declaration of


death listed in subsection A of this section shall be confirmed by a


second, independent neurologist or licensed physician who is not


affiliated with the treating hospital, transplant team, organ


procurement organization, or anatomical donor program.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3116 BRC 1/15/2026 8:39:48 AM





























Req. No. 3116 Page 4